Nebraska, session 109, LB194.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 76-902, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-902 The tax imposed by section 76-901 shall not apply to:
(1) Deeds recorded prior to November 18, 1965;
(2) Deeds to property transferred by or to the United States of America,
the State of Nebraska, or any of their agencies or political subdivisions;
(3) Deeds which secure or release a debt or other obligation;
(4) Deeds which, without additional consideration, confirm, correct,
modify, or supplement a deed previously recorded but which do not extend or
limit existing title or interest;
(5)(a)(i) (5)(a) Deeds between spouses, between ex-spouses for the purpose
of conveying any rights to property acquired or held during the marriage, or
between parent and child, without actual consideration therefor, and (ii) (b)
deeds to or from a family corporation, partnership, or limited liability
company when all the shares of stock of the corporation or interest in the
partnership or limited liability company are owned by members of a family, or a
trust created for the benefit of a member of that family, related to one
another within the fourth degree of kindred according to the rules of civil
law, and their spouses, for no consideration other than the issuance of stock
of the corporation or interest in the partnership or limited liability company
to such family members or the return of the stock to the corporation in partial
or complete liquidation of the corporation or deeds in dissolution of the
interest in the partnership or limited liability company. In determining
members of a family under this subdivision, step relationships shall be
considered the same as blood relationships. In order to qualify for the
exemption for family corporations, partnerships, or limited liability
companies, the property shall be transferred in the name of the corporation or
partnership and not in the name of the individual shareholders, partners, or
members. ;
(b) For purposes of clarification, the exemptions set forth in subdivision
(5)(a) of this section shall apply to deeds transferring property to a
corporation that is wholly owned by a single shareholder, or to a limited
liability company that is wholly owned by a single member, in any of the
following situations:
(i) The grantor is the same person as the single owner of such wholly
owned corporation or limited liability company;
(ii) The grantors are spouses transferring property to a corporation or
limited liability company wholly owned by one of the spouses; or
(iii) The grantors are members of a family, as described in subdivision
(5)(a)(ii) of this section, transferring property to a corporation or limited
liability company wholly owned by one of the members of such family;
(6) Tax deeds;
(7) Deeds of partition;
(8) Deeds made pursuant to mergers, consolidations, sales, or transfers of
the assets of corporations pursuant to plans of merger or consolidation filed
with the office of Secretary of State. A copy of such plan filed with the
Secretary of State shall be presented to the register of deeds before such
exemption is granted;
(9) Deeds made by a subsidiary corporation to its parent corporation for
no consideration other than the cancellation or surrender of the subsidiary's
stock;
(10) Cemetery deeds;
(11) Mineral deeds;
(12) Deeds executed pursuant to court decrees;
(13) Land contracts;
(14) Deeds which release a reversionary interest, a condition subsequent
or precedent, a restriction, or any other contingent interest;
(15) Deeds of distribution executed by a personal representative conveying
to devisees or heirs property passing by testate or intestate succession;
(16) Transfer on death deeds or revocations of transfer on death deeds;
(17) Certified or authenticated death certificates;
(18) Deeds transferring property located within the boundaries of an
Indian reservation if the grantor or grantee is a reservation Indian;
(19) Deeds transferring property into a trust if the transfer of the same
property would be exempt if the transfer was made directly from the grantor to
the beneficiary or beneficiaries under the trust. No such exemption shall be
granted unless the register of deeds is presented with a signed statement
certifying that the transfer of the property is made under such circumstances
-1-

LB194 LB194
2025 2025
as to come within one of the exemptions specified in this section and that
evidence supporting the exemption is maintained by the person signing the
statement and is available for inspection by the Department of Revenue;
(20) Deeds transferring property from a trustee to a beneficiary of a
trust;
(21) Deeds which convey property held in the name of any partnership or
limited liability company not subject to subdivision (5) of this section to any
partner in the partnership or member of the limited liability company or to his
or her spouse;
(22) Leases;
(23) Easements;
(24) Deeds which transfer title from a trustee to a beneficiary pursuant
to a power of sale exercised by a trustee under a trust deed; or
(25) Deeds transferring property, without actual consideration therefor,
to a nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income tax under
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is not a private foundation
as defined in section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
Sec. 2. Original section 76-902, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-2-